Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-112
Division fence; injury or destruction; repair.

Whenever a division fence is injured or destroyed by fire, floods, or other casualty, the person bound to construct and maintain such fence, or any part thereof, shall make repairs to the same, or his or her just proportion thereof, as provided in section 34-102.

R.S.1866, c. 1, § 23, p. 9;

R.S.1913, § 2486;

C.S.1922, § 2426;

C.S.1929, § 34-110;

R.S.1943, § 34-112;

Laws 2007, LB108, § 4.